Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1518
Environmental Infrastructure Sustainability Fund; created; use; investment.

The Environmental Infrastructure Sustainability Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the department. Revenue from the following sources shall be credited to the fund: (1) Application fees collected under section 81-1519; (2) reimbursements for actual costs necessary to complete environmental infrastructure sustainability evaluations as authorized under section 81-1517; (3) supplemental environmental projects resulting from enforcement settlements; and (4) gifts, grants, reimbursements, or appropriations from any source intended to be used for purposes of section 81-1517. The fund shall be used by the department to offset costs related to the completion of environmental infrastructure sustainability evaluations as authorized by section 81-1517. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB413, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.